Wyoming, session 2025, HB0233.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The account created by 2021 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 112, Section 2 and continued by 2023 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 6, Section 1 shall be continued and
renamed as the natural resource litigation account. Any
funds in the account on the effective date of this act
shall remain in the account. Funds in the account shall not
HB0233

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0641
be transferred or expended for any purpose other than
administering and enforcing the provisions of this section.

(b) There is appropriated seven million five hundred
thousand dollars ($7,500,000.00) from the general fund to
the natural resource litigation account. Notwithstanding
W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, any unexpended,
unobligated funds in the account shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027.

(c) Funds in the natural resource litigation account
are continuously appropriated to the office of the governor
for litigation expenses incurred in defending, commencing,
intervening in or prosecuting lawsuits against the federal
government and its agencies, other states or other states'
agencies and local governments that enact and enforce laws
or regulations, or other actions by the federal government,
other states, local governments or third parties, that
impermissibly impede Wyoming's ability to manage or develop
its natural resources. Such actions may include, but are
not limited to, restrictions on the leasing, use or export
of coal and any measures that cause or result in the
retirement of coal-fired electric generation facilities
HB0233

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0641
located in Wyoming, a decreased use of Wyoming coal or the
closure of coal-fired electric generation facilities that
use Wyoming coal.

(d) On or before October 1, 2025 and each year
thereafter until October 1, 2027, the governor and the
attorney general shall report to the joint appropriations
committee and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee on:

(i) The expenditure of any funds in the natural
resource litigation account incurred in defending,
commencing, intervening in or prosecuting lawsuits
authorized in accordance with this section;

(ii) The status of any litigation initiated,
intervened in, defended, prosecuted or concluded using
funds in the natural resource litigation account. The
governor and attorney general may present the information
required by this paragraph in executive session.

Section 2. 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 6 is
repealed.
HB0233

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0641

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0233